Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Chapter 12. Arctic Winter Games.

Sec. 05.12.010.
Arctic Winter Games.

A person may not use, display, or publish the symbol of the Arctic Winter Games, consisting of the triple circle symbol and ulu combination, for commercial purposes or private gain without the written authorization of the Arctic Winter Games International Committee.

A person may not use, display, or publish any name, title, or device that tends to indicate that the person is affiliated with or supported by the Arctic Winter Games without the written authorization of the Arctic Winter Games International Committee.

A person who violates a provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $100. Each day of unauthorized use, display, or publication is a separate offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 131 SLA 1972; am §§ 4, 5 ch 23 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

11.70.050

.
Renumbered in 1978.